Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Student parents at institutions. 1. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education governed by the state board of regents or a community college established under chapter 260C. âInstitutionâ also includes Senate File 288, p. 2 the faculty, staff, and other employees of such institution of higher education or community college established under chapter 260C. b. âReasonable accommodationsâ includes but is not limited to all of the following: (1) Taking additional health and safety measures. (2) Allowing a student to reschedule tests and assignment due dates that are missed for reasons related to the studentâs pregnancy. (3) Allowing a student to take a leave of absence. (4) Excusing absences for reasons deemed medically necessary due to the pregnancy. c. âStudentâ means a biological female. 2. An institution shall not require a student enrolled in a course of study or research activity to take a leave of absence, withdraw from a program, or limit the studentâs participation in academic activities solely due to pregnancy. An institution shall make reasonable accommodations to a pregnant student to allow the student to complete a course of study or research. 3. a. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant or has recently given birth an additional, reasonable period of time to take examinations that is consistent with the policies of the institution and that is mutually agreed to by the student and the institution. b. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant or has recently given birth an additional, reasonable period of time to complete a degree or candidacy for a degree that is consistent with the policies of the institution and that is mutually agreed to by the student and the institution. 4. An institution shall allow a student who is pregnant or has recently given birth to take a leave of absence for a reasonable period of time that is consistent with the policies of the institution and that is mutually agreed to by the student and the institution. Following the leave of absence, the student shall be allowed to return to the studentâs program with the same standing as the student left to the extent reasonably possible. Senate File 288, p. 3 5. The institution employee charged with coordination of the institutionâs compliance with Title IX of the federal Education Amendments Act of 1972 shall maintain a system to receive and investigate complaints from students alleging a violation of this section. 6. An institution shall do all of the following: a. Maintain a written policy for students on pregnancy discrimination and procedures for addressing pregnancy discrimination complaints under this section and the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq. The institution shall provide a copy of the policy to institution faculty, staff, and employees in required training. The institution shall provide a copy of the policy to all students attending orientation at the institution. b. Prominently post notice of the protections afforded to pregnant students and students who have recently given birth under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq., on the institutionâs internet site. c. Provide information concerning the protections afforded to pregnant students and students who have recently given birth under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq., through the institutionâs medical center and health center to a student upon the studentâs request and when otherwise appropriate. d. Assign responsibility for pregnancy and parenting support and protection to an office of the institution other than the office responsible for coordination of the institutionâs compliance with Title IX of the federal Education Amendments Act of 1972. The institution shall post the name, location, and contact information of the responsible office on the institutionâs internet site. Responsibilities assigned to the office pursuant to this paragraph shall include but not be limited to: (1) Maintaining current knowledge of the provisions of this section. (2) Overseeing institution compliance with this section. (3) Understanding and publicizing topics related to pregnancy and parenting, including but not limited to child care availability, breastfeeding accommodations, and pregnancy Senate File 288, p. 4 and parenting assistance from public and private providers, in order to enhance campus life and academic performance. 7. This section does not apply to a student with respect to the studentâs employment by an institution. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 288, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor